Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.47.030

Public highways—Acquisition, agreements, transfers, regulations.

The provisions of Title 47 RCW shall apply to code cities, its officers and employees to the same extent as such provisions are applicable to any other class of city within the state, including, without limitation, the following: (1) The acquisition by the state of municipal lands and the exchange of state highway and municipal lands, as provided in chapter 47.12 RCW; (2) the dedication of public land for city streets as provided by RCW 36.34.290 and 36.34.300; (3) city contributions to finance toll facilities as provided in RCW 47.56.250; (4) contracts with the department of transportation, as provided in RCW 47.01.210; (5) the construction, maintenance, jurisdiction, and control of city streets, as provided in chapter 47.24 RCW; (6) agreements between the department of transportation and a city for the benefit or improvement of highways, roads, or streets, as provided in RCW 47.28.140; (7) sales, leases, or transfers as authorized by RCW 47.12.063, 47.12.066, and 47.12.080; (8) the erection of information signs as regulated by RCW 47.42.050 and 47.42.060; (9) provisions relating to limited access highways under chapter 47.52 RCW; (10) the acquisition and abandonment for state highways as provided by RCW 36.75.090 and 90.28.020; and (11) the sharing of maintenance of streets and alleys as an extension of county roads as provided by RCW 35.77.020.

[ 1984 c 258 s 321; 1983 c 3 s 69; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.47.030.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.